Utah statutes.
19-6-709.   Reclamation of site or facility.

(1)  The owner or operator of any of the following operations shall reclaim the site of the operation to a post-operations land use, as approved by the board in coordination with the department, when the operation ceases or the permit is revoked:

(a)  DIYer used oil collection center;

(b)  used oil collection center;

(c)  used oil aggregation point;

(d)  used oil transfer facility; or

(e)  used oil processing or rerefining facility.

(2)  DIYer used oil collection centers, used oil collection centers, and used oil aggregation points are not required to post a reclamation surety under this part, but are subject to the reclamation requirements of this section.

(3)  Facilities and sites required to be permitted under this part shall post a reclamation surety in a form and amount required by board rule prior to issuance of a permit.

